Maryland, session 2026, HB0631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–708.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Local official” means an individual serving in a publicly elected office
of a local government unit, as defined in § 10–101 of the State Government Article.
(3) (i) “State official” has the meaning stated in § 5–101 of the General
Provisions Article.
(ii) “State official” includes the Governor, Governor–elect,
Lieutenant Governor, and Lieutenant Governor–elect.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0631*

HOUSE BILL 631
(4) “Threat” includes:
(i) an oral threat; or
(ii) a threat in any written form, whether or not the writing is signed,
or if the writing is signed, whether or not it is signed with a fictitious name or any other
mark.
(b) A person may not knowingly and willfully make a threat to take the life of,
kidnap, or cause physical injury to a State official, a local official, a deputy State’s Attorney,
an assistant State’s Attorney, or an assistant Public Defender.
(c) A person may not knowingly send, deliver, part with, or make for the purpose
of sending or delivering a threat prohibited under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a [misdemeanor] FELONY and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding [3] 10 years or a fine not exceeding
[$2,500] $5,000 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.